Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Discrimination

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to discrimination between pupils in schools, see art. 7, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision prohibiting discrimination by railroads and telegraph lines, see art. 10, § 12, Wyo. Const.

As to a child's right to attend public school regardless of sex, race or religion, see §

21-4-303

.

As to fair employment practices, see §§

27-9-101

through

27-9-106

.

As to discrimination in trade and commerce generally, see §§

40-4-101

through

40-4-123

.

As to discrimination against citizens of this state by charging higher and more inequitable rates for music licenses, see §

40-13-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d Civil Rights § 1 et seq.; 45A Am. Jur. 2d Job Discrimination §§ 1 et seq.

14 Supp. C.J.S. Civil Rights § 1 et seq.

§ 6-9-101.
Equal enjoyment of public accommodations and facilities; penalties.

All persons of good deportment are entitled to the full and equal enjoyment of all accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of all places or agencies which are public in nature, or which invite the patronage of the public, without any distinction, discrimination or restriction on account of race, religion, color, sex or national origin.

A person who intentionally violates this section commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion of one sex from admission to or enjoyment of equal privileges in places of accommodation or entertainment as actionable sex discrimination under state law, 38 ALR4th 339.

What constitutes private club or association not otherwise open to public that is exempt from state civil rights statute, 83 ALR5th 467.

§ 6-9-102.
Discrimination prohibited; penalties.

No person shall be denied the right to life, liberty, pursuit of happiness or the necessities of life because of race, color, sex, creed or national origin.

A person who violates this section commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to equality of all, see art. 1, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to equal political rights, see art. 1, § 3, Wyo. Const.

Statutes of this state fail to make any distinction as to religious belief

and prohibit such distinction from being made. Wilson v. Wilson, 473 P.2d 595,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1970).

Law reviews. —

For note on civil rights in Wyoming, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 76 (1958).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Race or religious belief as permissible consideration in choosing tenants or purchasers of real estate, 14 ALR2d 153.

Businesses or establishments falling within state civil rights statute prohibiting discrimination, 87 ALR2d 120.

Discrimination in provision of municipal services or facilities as civil rights violation, 51 ALR3d 950.

Racial or religious discrimination in furnishing of public utilities, services or facilities, 53 ALR3d 1027.

What constitutes private club or association not otherwise open to public that is exempt from state civil rights statute, 83 ALR5th 467.

Attorney's liability under 42 USC § 1983 for improperly instituting or pursuing legal procedure, 72 ALR Fed 724.

When is eviction of tenant by private landlord conducted “under color of state law” for purposes of 42 USC § 1983, 73 ALR Fed 78.

“Redlining,” consisting of denial of home loans or insurance coverage in certain neighborhoods, as discrimination in violation of §§ 804 and 805 of Fair Housing Act (42 USC §§ 3604, 3605), 73 ALR Fed 899.

Construction and application of § 804(f) of Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. § 3604(f)), prohibiting discrimination in housing because of individual's disability, 148 ALR Fed 1.

§ 6-9-103.
Charging for public toilet facilities; penalty.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) if he charges for use of toilet facilities which are generally available to the public.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).